New York, session 2025-2026, S2085.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 137 of the public service law, as 2 added by section 11 of part O of chapter 58 of the laws of 2024, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. "CLCPA targets" shall mean the public policies established in the 5 climate leadership and community protection act enacted in chapter one 6 hundred six of the laws of two thousand nineteen, including but not 7 limited to the requirement that a minimum of seventy percent of the 8 statewide electric generation be produced by renewable energy systems by 9 two thousand thirty, that by the year two thousand forty the statewide 10 electrical demand system will generate zero emissions, and the procure- 11 ment of at least nine gigawatts of offshore wind electricity generation 12 by two thousand thirty-five, at least fifteen gigawatts of offshore wind 13 electricity generation by two thousand forty, at least eighteen giga- 14 watts of offshore wind electricity generation by two thousand forty- 15 five, at least twenty gigawatts of offshore wind electricity generation 16 by two thousand fifty, six gigawatts of photovoltaic solar generation by 17 two thousand twenty-five and to support three gigawatts of statewide 18 energy storage capacity by two thousand thirty. 19 § 2. Subdivision 5 of section 66-p of the public service law, as added 20 by chapter 106 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00195-03-5 S. 2085 2 1 5. No later than July first, two thousand twenty-four, the commission 2 shall establish programs to require the procurement by the state's load 3 serving entities of at least nine gigawatts of offshore wind electricity 4 generation by two thousand thirty-five, at least fifteen gigawatts of 5 offshore wind electricity generation by two thousand forty, at least 6 eighteen gigawatts of offshore wind electricity generation by two thou- 7 sand forty-five, at least twenty gigawatts of offshore wind electricity 8 generation by two thousand fifty, and six gigawatts of photovoltaic 9 solar generation by two thousand twenty-five, and to support three giga- 10 watts of statewide energy storage capacity by two thousand thirty. 11 § 3. Paragraph e of subdivision 13 of section 75-0103 of the environ- 12 mental conservation law, as added by chapter 106 of the laws of 2019, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 e. Measures to achieve six gigawatts of distributed solar energy 15 capacity installed in the state by two thousand twenty-five, nine giga- 16 watts of offshore wind capacity installed by two thousand thirty-five, 17 at least fifteen gigawatts of offshore wind electricity generation by 18 two thousand forty, at least eighteen gigawatts of offshore wind elec- 19 tricity generation by two thousand forty-five and at least twenty 20 gigawatts of offshore wind electricity generation by two thousand fifty, 21 a statewide energy efficiency goal of one hundred eighty-five trillion 22 British thermal units energy reduction from the two thousand twenty-five 23 forecast; and three gigawatts of statewide energy storage capacity by 24 two thousand thirty. 25 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 26 the amendments to subdivision 1 of section 137 of the public service law 27 made by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 28 section and shall be deemed repealed therewith.